Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202586-1060
Commission; duties.

The commission shall:

(1) Serve as the statewide coordinating authority for the implementation of the 911 service system;

(2) Be responsible for statewide planning, implementation, coordination, funding assistance, deployment, regulation, and management and maintenance of the 911 service system to ensure that coordinated 911 service is provided to all residents of the state at a consistent level of service in a cost-effective manner;

(3) Be responsible for establishing mandatory and uniform technical and training standards applicable to public safety answering points and adopting and promulgating rules and regulations applicable to public safety answering points for quality assurance standards;

(4) Appoint the members of the committee and act on the committee's recommendations as provided in section 86-1061;

(5)(a) Determine how to allocate the 911 Service System Fund in order to facilitate the planning, implementation, coordination, operation, management, and maintenance of the 911 service system;

(b) Create a mechanism for determining the level of funding available to or for the benefit of local governing bodies, public safety answering points, and third-party service or infrastructure providers for costs determined to be eligible by the commission under subdivision (5)(c) of this section; and

(c) Establish standards and criteria concerning disbursements from the 911 Service System Fund for the planning, implementation, coordination, operation, management, and maintenance of the 911 service system. In establishing such standards and criteria, the following may be eligible for funding:

(i) Costs incurred by or on behalf of local governing bodies or public safety answering points to provide 911 service, including, but not limited to, (A) acquisition of new equipment and related maintenance costs and license fees, (B) upgrades and modifications, (C) delivering next-generation 911 core services, and (D) training personnel used to provide 911 services; and

(ii) Costs incurred by or on behalf of local governing bodies or public safety answering points for the acquisition, installation, maintenance, and operation of telecommunications equipment and telecommunications service required for the provision of 911 service; and

(6) Adopt statewide uniform standards for technical enhancement, support, training, and quality assurance that will allow the 911 service system to communicate, coordinate, and engage with the 988 Suicide and Crisis Lifeline. Such standards shall provide that service users calling the 911 service system can be connected to the 988 Suicide and Crisis Lifeline, and individuals calling the 988 Suicide and Crisis Lifeline can be connected to the 911 service system, when deemed appropriate by the call-center operators. The purpose of such dual capability is to facilitate the provision of appropriate emergency services, including instances requiring counseling services for an individual in psychological distress. The standards shall be completed so that the dual capability to connect individuals between both the 988 Suicide and Crisis Lifeline and the 911 service system is operational no later than January 1, 2025.

Laws 2016, LB938, § 25;

Laws 2018, LB993, § 12;

Laws 2024, LB1200, § 68;

R.S.1943, (2024), § 86-1025;

Laws 2025, LB362, § 42.